Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.070

Compensation—Reimbursement of travel expenses.

Members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Attendance at meetings of the commission shall be deemed performance by a member of the duties of his or her employment.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5169; 1984 c 287 s 85; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 126; 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 7.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.